Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 3. Uniform Transfer-On-Death Security Registration Act.

Sec. 13.33.301.
Definitions.

In AS

13.33.301

—

13.33.310

,

“beneficiary form” means a registration of a security that indicates the present owner of the security and the intention of the owner regarding the person who will become the owner of the security upon the death of the owner;

“POD” means “pay on death”;

“register,” including its derivatives, means to issue a certificate showing the ownership of a certificated security or, in the case of an uncertificated security, to initiate or transfer an account showing ownership of securities;

“registering entity” means a person who originates or transfers a security title by registration and includes a broker maintaining security accounts for customers and a transfer agent or other person acting for or as an issuer of securities;

“security” means a share, participation, or other interest in property, in a business, or in an obligation of an enterprise or other issuer and includes a certificated security, an uncertificated security, and a security account;

“security account” means

a reinvestment account associated with a security, a securities account with a broker, a cash balance in a brokerage account, cash, cash equivalents, interest, earnings, or dividends earned or declared on a security in an account, a reinvestment account, or a brokerage account, whether or not credited to the account before the owner’s death;

a cash balance or other property held for or due to the owner of a security as a replacement for or product of an account security, whether or not credited to the account before the owner’s death; or

an investment management account, or a custody account, with a trust company or with a trust division of a bank with trust powers; this subparagraph includes, whether or not credited to the account before the owner’s death,

the securities in the account;

a cash balance in the account; and

cash, cash equivalents, interest, earnings, or dividends that are earned or declared on a security in the account;

“TOD” means “transfer on death.”

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 121 SLA 2004)

Sec. 13.33.302.
Registration in beneficiary form; sole or multiple ownership.

Only individuals whose registration of a security shows sole ownership by one individual or multiple ownership by two or more with right of survivorship, rather than as tenants in common, may obtain registration in beneficiary form. Multiple owners of a security registered in beneficiary form hold as joint tenants with right of survivorship, as tenants by the entirety, or as owners of community property held in survivorship form, and not as tenants in common.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.303.
Registration in beneficiary form; applicable law.

A security may be registered in beneficiary form if the form is authorized by this or a similar TOD statute of the state of

organization of the issuer or registering entity;

the registering entity’s principal office;

the office of the registering entity’s transfer agent or the registering entity’s office making the registration; or

the owner’s address at the time of registration.

A registration governed by the law of a jurisdiction in which this or similar TOD legislation is not in force or was not in force when a registration in beneficiary form was made is nevertheless presumed to be valid and authorized as a matter of contract law.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.304.
Origination of registration in beneficiary form.

A security, whether evidenced by certificate or account, is registered in beneficiary form when the registration includes a designation of a beneficiary to take the ownership at the death of the owner or the deaths of all multiple owners.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.305.
Form of registration in beneficiary form.

Registration in beneficiary form may be shown by the words “transfer on death” or the abbreviation “TOD,” or by words “pay on death” or the abbreviation “POD,” after the name of the registered owner and before the name of a beneficiary.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.306.
Effect, cancellation, and change of registration in beneficiary form.

The designation of a TOD beneficiary on a registration in beneficiary form does not have an effect on ownership until the owner’s death. A registration of a security in beneficiary form may be canceled or changed at any time by the sole owner or all then surviving owners without the consent of the beneficiary.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.307.
Ownership on death of owner.

On death of a sole owner or the last to die of all multiple owners, ownership of securities registered in beneficiary form passes to the beneficiary or beneficiaries who survive all owners. On proof of death of all owners and compliance with any applicable requirements of the registering entity, a security registered in beneficiary form may be reregistered in the name of the beneficiary or beneficiaries who survived the death of all owners. Until division of the security after the death of all owners, multiple beneficiaries surviving the death of all owners hold their interests as tenants in common. If no beneficiary survives the death of all owners, the security belongs to the estate of the deceased sole owner or the estate of the last to die of all multiple owners.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.308.
Protection of registering entity.

A registering entity is not required to offer or to accept a request for security registration in beneficiary form. If a registration in beneficiary form is offered by a registering entity, the owner requesting registration in beneficiary form assents to the protections given to the registering entity by AS

13.33.301

—

13.33.310

.

By accepting a request for registration of a security in beneficiary form, the registering entity agrees that the registration will be implemented on death of the deceased owner as provided in AS

13.33.301

—

13.33.310

.

A registering entity is discharged from all claims to a security by the estate, creditors, heirs, or devisees of a deceased owner if it registers a transfer of the security in accordance with AS

13.33.307

and does so in good faith reliance on

the registration;

AS

13.33.301

—

13.33.310

; and

information provided to it by affidavit of the personal representative of the deceased owner, or by the surviving beneficiary or by the surviving beneficiary’s representatives, or other information available to the registering entity.

The protections of AS

13.33.301

—

13.33.310

do not extend to a reregistration or payment made after a registering entity has received written notice from a claimant to any interest in the security objecting to implementation of a registration in beneficiary form. Other notice or other information available to the registering entity does not affect its right to protection under AS

13.33.301

—

13.33.310

.

The protection provided by AS

13.33.301

—

13.33.310

to the registering entity of a security does not affect the rights of beneficiaries in disputes between themselves and other claimants to ownership of the security transferred or its value or proceeds.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.309.
Nontestamentary transfer on death.

A transfer on death resulting from a registration in beneficiary form is effective by reason of the contract regarding the registration between the owner and the registering entity and AS

13.33.301

—

13.33.310

and is not testamentary.

AS

13.33.301

—

13.33.310

do not limit the rights of creditors of security owners against beneficiaries and other transferees under other laws of this state.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.33.310.
Terms, conditions, and forms for registration.

A registering entity offering to accept registrations in beneficiary form may establish the terms and conditions under which it will receive requests for registrations in beneficiary form and for implementation of registrations in beneficiary form, including requests for cancellation of previously registered TOD beneficiary designations and requests for reregistration to effect a change of beneficiary. The terms and conditions established under this subsection may provide for proving death, avoiding or resolving problems concerning fractional shares, designating primary and contingent beneficiaries, and substituting a named beneficiary’s descendants to take in the place of the named beneficiary in the event of the beneficiary’s death. Substitution may be indicated by appending to the name of the primary beneficiary the letters LDPS, standing for “lineal descendants per stirpes.” This designation substitutes a deceased beneficiary’s descendants who survive the owner for a beneficiary who fails to so survive, the descendants to be identified and to share in accordance with the law of the beneficiary’s domicile at the owner’s death governing inheritance by descendants of an intestate. Other forms of identifying beneficiaries who are to take on one or more contingencies, and rules for providing proofs and assurances needed to satisfy reasonable concerns by registering entities regarding conditions and identities relevant to accurate implementation of registrations in beneficiary form, may be contained in a registering entity’s terms and conditions.

The following are illustrations of registrations in beneficiary form that a registering entity may authorize:

sole owner-sole beneficiary: John S Brown TOD (or POD) John S Brown Jr.;

multiple owners-sole beneficiary: John S Brown Mary B Brown JT TEN TOD John S Brown Jr.;

multiple owners-primary and secondary (substituted) beneficiaries: John S Brown Mary B Brown JT TEN TOD John S Brown Jr. SUB BENE Peter Q Brown; or John S Brown Mary B Brown JT TEN TOD John S Brown Jr. LDPS.

History.

(§ 12 ch 75 SLA 1996)